Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.240

Sewerage lien foreclosure—Procedure.

The service of summons, and all other proceedings except as herein otherwise prescribed including appeal, order of sale, sale, redemption, and issuance of deed, shall be governed by the statutes now or hereafter in force relating to the foreclosure of mortgages on real property. The terms "judgment debtor" or "successor in interest" in the statutes governing redemption when applied herein shall include an owner or a vendee.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.67.240. Prior: 1941 c 193 s 7, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9354-10, part.]